North Dakota, session 69, SB2312.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new subsection to section 57-02-08 of the North Dakota Century Code is
created and enacted as follows:
All property owned by a charitable organization and used primarily for the purpose of
equine events that are not conducted for profit.
SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act is effective for taxable years beginning after
December 31, 2024.
Page No. 1 25.1212.02000